en: Keep only in the original container at a temperature not exceeding …°C (to be specified by the manufacturer), S47/49
cs: Uchovávejte pouze v původním obalu při teplotě nepřesahující… °C (specifikuje vý robce), S47/49
de: Nur im Originalbehälter bei einer Temperatur von nicht über …°C (vom Hersteller anzugeben) aufbewahren, S47/49
dk: Må kun opbevares i originalemballagen ved en temperatur på ikke over …°C (angives af fabrikanten), S47/49
el: ∆ιατηρείται µόνο µέσα στο αρχικό δοχείο σε θερµοκρασία που δέν υπερβαίνει τους… °C (καθορίζεται από τον παραγωγό), S47/49
es: Consérvese únicamente en el recipiente de origen y a temperatura no superior a …°C (a especificar por el fabricante), S47/49
et: Hoida ainult originaalpakendis\, temperatuuril mitte üle… °C (määrab valmistaja), S47/49
fi: Säilytettävä alkuperäispakkauksessa alle… °C:n lämpötilassa (valmistaja/maahantuoja ilmoittaa lämpötilan), S47/49
fr: Conserver uniquement dans le récipient d'origine à une température ne dépassant pas …°C (à préciser par le fabricant), S47/49
hu: Legfeljebb… °C hőmérsékleten\, csak az eredeti edényzetben tárolható (a hőmérsékletet a gyártó határozza meg), S47/49
it: Conservare soltanto nel contenitore originale a temperatura non superiore a …°C (da precisare da parte del fabbricante), S47/49
lt: Laikyti tik gamintojo pakuotėje\, ne aukštesnėje negu… °C temperatūroje (nurodo gamintojas), S47/49
lv: Uzglabāt tikai orig‘ inālajā iepakojumā temperatūrā\, kas nepārsniedz… °C (norāda ražotājs), S47/49
mt: Żomm biss fil-kontenitur oriġinali f'temperatura li ma taqbiżx… °C (ikun speċifikat mill-manifattur), S47/49
nl: Uitsluitend in de oorspronkelijke verpakking bewaren bij een temperatuur beneden …°C (aan te geven door de fabrikant), S47/49
no: Må kun oppbevares i den originale emballasjen ved lavere temperatur enn …°C (angis av produsent eller importør), S47/49
pl: Przechowywać wyłącznie w oryginalnym opakowaniu w temperaturze nieprzekraczającej… °C (określi producent), S47/49
pt: Conservar unicamente no recipiente de origem a temperatura que não exceda …°C (a especificar pelo produtor), S47/49
sk: Uchovávajte len v pôvodnej nádobe pri teplote nepresahujúcej… °C (teplota bude špecifikovaná výrobcom), S47/49
sl: Hraniti samo v izvirni posodi pri temperaturi\, ki ne presega…, S47/49
sv: Förvaras endast i originalförpackning vid en temperatur som inte överstiger …°C (anges av tillverkaren), S47/49

de: Nur im Originalbehälter aufbewahren bei einer Temperatur von nicht über:, S47/49.1
en: Store only in the original container at a temperature not exceeding:, S47/49.1
da: Må kun opbevares i originalemballagen ved en temperatur på højst:, S47/49.1
es: Consérvese únicamente en el recipiente de origen a una temperatura no superior a:, S47/49.1
fi: Säilytettävä alkuperäispakkauksessa alle …°C, S47/49.1
fr: Conserver uniquement dans le récipient d'origine à une température ne dépassant pas:, S47/49.1
it: Conservare soltanto nel contenitore originale ad una temperatura non superiore a:, S47/49.1
nl: Uitsluitend in het originele reservoir bewaren op een temperatuur die niet hoger is dan:, S47/49.1
no: Må kun oppbevares i den originale emballasjen ved lavere temperatur enn:, S47/49.1
pt: Conservar unicamente no recipiente de origem a temperatura que não exceda:, S47/49.1
sv: Förvaras i den ursprungliga förpackningen vid en temperatur som inte överstiger:, S47/49.1

en: Keep wet with… (appropriate material to be specified by the manu facturer), S48
cs: Uchovávejte ve zvlhčeném stavu… (vhodnou látku specifikuje výrobce a dovozce), S48
de: Feucht halten mit… (geeignetes Mittel vom Hersteller anzugeben), S48
dk: Holdes befugtet med… (passende middel angives af fabrikanten), S48
el: Να διατηρείται υγρό µε… (το κατάλληλο υλικό καθορίζεται από τον παραγωγό), S48
es: Consérvese húmedo con… (medio apropiado especificar por el fabricante), S48
et: Hoida niisutatult… (sobiva kemikaali määrab valmistaja), S48
fi: Säilytettävä kosteana… (valmistaja/maahantuoja ilmoittaa sopivan aineen), S48
fr: Maintenir humide avec… (moyen approprié à préciser par le fabricant), S48
it: Mantenere umido con… (mezzo appropriato da precisare da parte del fabbricante), S48
lt: Laikyti sudrėkintą… (kuo — nurodo gamintojas), S48
lv: Uzglabāt samitrinātu ar… (piemērotu vielu norāda ražotājs), S48
mt: Żomm umdu b'… (il-materjal adatt ikun speċifikat mill-manifattur), S48
nl: Inhoud vochtig houden met… (middel aan te geven door de fabrikant), S48
no: Varen skal holdes fuktig med… (angis av produsent eller importør), S48
pl: Przechowywać produkt zwilżony… (właściwy materiał określi producent), S48
pt: Manter húmido com… (material adequado a especificar pelo produtor), S48
sk: Uchovávajte vlhké s… (vhodný materiál špecifikuje výrobca), S48
sl: Hraniti prepojeno z/s… (primerno omočilo določi proizvajalec), S48
sv: Innehållet skall hallas fuktigt med… (lämpligt material anges av tillverkaren), S48

en: Keep wet with water, S48.1
de: Feucht halten mit Wasser, S48.1
dk: Holdes befugtet med vand, S48.1
es: Consérvese húmedo con agua, S48.1
fi: Säilytettävä kosteana veden avulla, S48.1
fr: Maintenir humide avec de l'eau, S48.1
it: Mantenere umido con acqua, S48.1
nl: Inhoud vochtig houden met water, S48.1
no: Varen skal holdes fuktig med vann, S48.1
pt: Manter húmido com água, S48.1
sv: Innehållet förvaras fuktigt med vatten, S48.1

en: Keep only in the original container, S49
cs: Uchovávejte pouze v původním obalu, S49
de: Nur im Originalbehälter aufbewahren, S49
dk: Må kun opbevares i den originale emballage, S49
el: ∆ιατηρείται µόνο µέσα στο αρχικό δοχείο, S49
es: Consérvese únicamente en el recipiente de origen, S49
et: Hoida ainult originaalpakendis, S49
fi: Säilytettävä vain alkuperäispakkauksessa, S49
fr: Conserver uniquement dans le récipient d'origine, S49
hu: Csak az eredeti edényzetben tárolható, S49
it: Conservare soltanto nel recipiente originale, S49
lt: Laikyti tik gamintojo pakuotėje, S49
lv: Uzglabāt tikai originālajā iepakojumā, S49
mt: Żomm biss fil-kontenitur oriġinali, S49
nl: Uitsluitend in de oorspronkelijke verpakking bewaren, S49
no: Må kun oppbevares i den originale emballasjen, S49
pl: Przechowywać wyłącznie w oryginalnym opakowaniu, S49
pt: Conservar unicamente no recipiente de origem, S49
sk: Uchovávajte len v pôvodnej nádobe, S49
sl: Hraniti samo v izvirni posodi, S49
sv: Förvaras endast i originalförpäckningen, S49

en: Keep contents under… (appropriate liquid to be specified by the manufacturer), S5
cs: Uchovávejte pod… (příslušnou kapalinu specifikuje vý robce), S5
de: Unter… aufbewahren (geeignete Flüssigkeit vom Hersteller anzugeben), S5
dk: Opbevares under… (en egnet væske\, som angives af fabrikanten), S5
el: Να διατηρείται το περιεχόµενο µέσα σε… (το είδος του κατάλ- ληλου υγρού καθορίζεται από τον παραγωγό), S5
es: Consérvese en… (líquido apropriado a especificar por el fabricante), S5
et: Hoida sisu… all (sobiva vedeliku määrab valmistaja), S5
fi: Sisältö säilytettävä… (tarkoitukseen soveltuvan nesteen ilmoittaa valmistaja/maahantuoja), S5
fr: Conserver sous… [liquide approprié à spécifier par le fabricant], S5
it: Conservare sotto… (liquido appropriato da indicarsi da parte del fabbricante), S5
lt: Laikyti užpiltą… (tinkamą skyst į nurodo gamintojas), S5
lv: Uzglabāt… (ražotājs norāda škidrumu\, kurā viela vai produkts uzglabājams), S5
mt: Żomm taħt… (il-likwidu adatt li jkun indikat mill-manifattur), S5
nl: Onder… houden (geschikte vloeistof aan te geven door fabrikant), S5
no: Oppbevares under… (angis av produsent eller importør), S5
pl: Przechowywać w… (cieczy wskazanej przez producenta), S5
pt: Manter sob… (líquido apropriado a especificar pelo produtor), S5
sk: Obsah uchovávajte pod… (vhodnou kvapalinou\, ktorú špecifikuje výrobca), S5
sl: Hraniti pod/v… (ustrezno tekočino\, v kateri je treba snov ali pripravek hraniti\, določi proizvajalec), S5
sv: Förvara innehållet i… (lämplig vätska anges av tillverkaren), S5

en: Keep contents under water, S5.1
de: Unter Wasser aufbewahren, S5.1

en: Do not mix with… (to be specified by the manufacturer), S50
cs: Nesměšujte s… (specifikuje vý robce), S50
de: Nicht mischen mit… (vom Hersteller anzugeben), S50
dk: Må ikke blandes med… (angives af fabrikanten), S50
el: Να µην αναµιχθεί µε… (καθορίζεται από τον παραγωγό), S50
es: No mezclar con… (a especificar por el fabricante), S50
et: Mitte kokku segada… (sobimatu kemikaali määrab valmistaja), S50
fi: Ei saa sekoittaa… (valmistaja/maahantuoja ilmoittaa aineen) kanssa, S50
fr: Ne pas mélanger avec… (à spécifier par le fabricant), S50
it: Non mescolare con… (da specificare da parte del fabbricante), S50
lt: Nemaišyti su… (nurodo gamintojas), S50
lv: Nedrīkst samaisīt ar… (norāda ražotājs), S50
mt: Tħallatx ma'… (ikun speċifikat mill-manifattur), S50
nl: Niet vermengen met… (aan te geven door de fabrikant), S50
no: Må ikke blandes med… (angis av produsent eller importør), S50
pl: Nie mieszać z… (określi producent), S50
pt: Não misturar com… (a especificar pelo produtor), S50
sk: Nemiešajte s… (bude špecifikované výrobcom), S50
sl: Ne mešati z/s… (določi proizvajalec), S50
sv: Blanda inte med… (anges av tillverkaren), S50

en: Do not mix with peroxide activators and reducing agents, S50.1
de: Nicht mischen mit Peroxidbeschleunigern und Reduktionsmitteln, S50.1
dk: Må ikke blandes med peroxidacceleratorer og reduktionsmidler, S50.1
es: No mezclar con acelerantes de peróxido y medios de reducción, S50.1
fi: Ei saa sekoittaa peroksidikiihdykkeiden eikä pelkistysasaneiden kanssa, S50.1
fr: Ne pas mélanger avec de l'accélérateur de péroxyde et des réducteurs, S50.1
it: Non mescolare con acceleratori per perossidi e riducenti, S50.1
nl: Niet mengen met peroxideversnellers en reductiemiddelen, S50.1
no: Må ikke blandes med peroksidakseleratorer og reduksjonsmidler, S50.1
pt: Não misturar com activadores de peróxido e agentes de redução, S50.1
sv: Får inte blandas med peroxidacceleratorer och reduktionsmedel, S50.1

en: Do not mix with acids, S50.2
de: Nicht mischen mit Säuren, S50.2
dk: Må ikke blandes med syrer, S50.2
es: No mezclar con ácidos, S50.2
fi: Ei saa sekoittaa happojen kanssa, S50.2
fr: Ne pas mélanger avec des acides, S50.2
it: Non mescolare con acidi, S50.2
nl: Niet vermengen met zuren, S50.2
no: Må ikke blandes med syre, S50.2
pt: Não misturar com ácidos, S50.2
sv: Får ej blandas med syror, S50.2

en: Do not mix with alkali, S50.3
de: Nicht mischen mit Laugen, S50.3
dk: Må ikke blandes med lud, S50.3
es: No mezclar con lejías, S50.3
fi: Ei saa sekoittaa emästen kansaa, S50.3
fr: Ne pas mélanger avec des lessives alcalines, S50.3
it: Non mescolare con alcali, S50.3
nl: Niet vermengen met logen, S50.3
no: Må ikke blandes med lut, S50.3
pt: Não misturar com lixívias, S50.3
sv: Får ej blandas med baser, S50.3

en: Do not mix with other chemicals, S50.4
de: Nicht mischen mit anderen Chemikalien, S50.4
dk: Må ikke blandes med andre kemikalier, S50.4
es: No mezclar con otras sustancias químicas, S50.4
fi: Ei saa sekoittaa muiden kemikaalien kanssa, S50.4
fr: Ne pas mélanger avec d'autres substances chimiques, S50.4
it: Non mescolare con altre sostanze chimiche, S50.4
nl: Niet mengen met andere chemicaliën, S50.4
no: Må ikke blandes med andre kjemikalier, S50.4
pt: Não misturar com os químicos, S50.4
sv: Får ej blandas med andra kemikalier, S50.4

en: Use only in well-ventilated areas, S51
cs: Používejte pouze v dobře větraných prostorách, S51
de: Nur in gut gelüfteten Bereichen verwenden, S51
dk: Må kun bruges på steder med god ventilation, S51
el: Να χρησιµοποιείται µόνο σε καλά αεριζόµενο χώρο, S51
es: Úsese únicamente en lugares bien ventilados, S51
et: Käidelda hästiventileeritavas kohas, S51
fi: Huolehdittava hyvästä ilmanvaihdosta, S51
fr: Utiliser seulement dans des zones bien ventilées, S51
hu: Csak jól szellőztetett helyen használható, S51
it: Usare soltanto in luogo ben ventilato, S51
lt: Naudoti tik gerai vėdinamose vietose, S51
lv: Izmantot tikai labi vēdināmās telpās, S51
mt: Uża biss fi spazji ventilati tajjeb, S51
nl: Uitsluitend op goed geventileerde plaatsen gebruiken, S51
no: Må bare anvendes på et godt ventilert sted, S51
pl: Stosować wyłącznie w dobrze wentylowanych pomieszczeniach, S51
pt: Utilizar somente em locais bem ventilados, S51
sk: Používajte len na dobre vetranom mieste, S51
sl: Uporabljati le v dobro prezračevanih prostorih, S51
sv: Sörj för god ventilation, S51

en: Not recommended for interior use on large surface areas, S52
cs: Nedoporučuje se pro použití v interiéru na velké plochy, S52
de: Nicht großflächig für Wohn- und Aufenthaltsräume zu verwenden, S52
dk: Bør ikke anvendes til større flader i beboelses- eller opholdsrum, S52
el: ∆εν συνιστάται η χρήση σε ευρείες επιφάνειες σε εσωτερικούς χώρους, S52
es: No usar sobre grandes superficies en locales habitados, S52
et: Mitte käidelda suletud ruumis laiadel pindadel, S52
fi: Ei suositella sisäkäyttöön laajoilla pinnoilla, S52
fr: Ne pas utiliser sur de grandes surfaces dans les locaux habités, S52
hu: Emberi tartózkodásra szolgáló helyiségekben nagy felületen nem használható, S52
it: Non utilizzare su grandi superfici in locali abitati, S52
lt: Nepatartina naudoti vidaus darbams\, esant didelio ploto paviršiams, S52
lv: Nav ieteicams izmantot iekštelpās uz lielām virsmām, S52
mt: Mhux rakkomandat għal użu fuq spazji ta' superfiċi kbira f'postijiet abitati, S52
nl: Niet voor gebruik op grote oppervlakken in woon- en verblijfruimten, S52
no: Bør ikke anvendes til større flater i beboelses- og eller oppholdsrom, S52
pl: Nie zaleca się nanoszenia na duże płaszczyzny wewnątrz pomieszczeń, S52
pt: Não utilizar em grandes superfícies nos locais habitados, S52
sk: Nie je doporučené pre použitie v interiéroch na vel’kých povrchových plochách, S52
sl: Ne uporabljati na velikih notranjih površinah, S52
sv: Olämpligt för användning inhomus vid behandling av stora ytor, S52

en: Avoid exposure - obtain special instructions before use, S53
cs: Zamezte expozici - před použitím si obstarejte speciální instrukce, S53
de: Exposition vermeiden - vor Gebrauch besondere Anweisungen einholen, S53
dk: Undgå enhver kontakt - indhent særlige anvisninger før brug, S53
el: Αποφεύγετε την έκθεση - εφοδιαστείτε µε τις ειδικές οδηγίες πριν από τη χρήση, S53
es: Evítese la exposición - recábense instrucciones especiales antes del uso, S53
et: Ohutu kasutamise tagamiseks tutvuda enne käitlemist kasutusjuhendiga, S53
fi: Vältettävä altistumista - ohjeet luettava ennen käyttöä, S53
fr: Éviter l'exposition - se procurer des instructions spéciales avant l 'utilisation, S53
hu: Kerülni kell az expozíciót\, - használata előtt szerezze be a külön használati utasítást, S53
it: Evitare l'esposizione - procurarsi speciali istruzioni prima dell'us o, S53
lt: Vengti poveikio - prieš naudojimą gauti specialias instrukcijas, S53
lv: Izvairīties no saskares\, pirms lietošanas iepazīties ar instrukciju, S53
mt: Evita li jitħalla espost – ġib istruzzjonijiet speċjali qabel tużah, S53
nl: Blootstelling vermijden - vóór gebruik speciale aanwijzingen raadplegen, S53
no: Unngå direkte kontakt - les nærmere angitt produkt-informasjon før bruk, S53
pl: Unikać narażenia – przed użyciem zapoznać się z instrukcją, S53
pt: Evitar a exposição - obter instruções específicas antes da utilização, S53
sk: Zabráňte expozícii - pred použitím sa oboznámte so špeciálnymi inštrukciami, S53
sl: Izogibati se izpostavljanju - pred uporabo pridobiti posebna navodila, S53
sv: Undvik exponering - Begär specialinstruktioner före användning, S53

en: Dispose of this material and its container to hazardous or special waste collection point, S56
cs: Zneškodněte tento materiál a jeho obal ve sběrném místě pro zvláštní nebo nebezpečné odpady, S56
de: Dieses Produkt und seinen Behälter der Problemabfallentsorgung zuführen, S56
dk: Aflever dette materiale og dets beholder til et indsamlingssted for farligt affald og problemaffald, S56
el: Το υλικό αυτό και ο περιέκτης του να εναποτεθούν σε χώρο συλλογής επικινδύνων ή ειδικών αποβλήτων, S56
es: Elimínense esta sustancia y su recipiente en un punto de recogida pública de residuos especiales o peligrosos, S56
et: Kemikaal ja tema pakend tuleb viia ohtlike jäätmete kogumispunkti, S56
fi: Tämä aine ja sen pakkaus on toimitettava ongelmajätteen vastaanottopaikkaan, S56
fr: Éliminer ce produit et son récipient dans un centre de collecte des déchets dangereux ou spéciaux, S56
hu: Az anyagot és edényzetét különleges hulladék- vagy veszélyeshulladék- gyűjtő helyre kell vinni, S56
it: Smaltire questo materiale e i relativi contenitori in un punto di raccolta di rifiuti pericolosi o speciali, S56
lt: Šios medžiagos atliekas ir jos pakuotę išvežti į  pavojingų atliekų surinkimo vietas, S56
lv: Likvidēt šo vielu vai tās iepakojumu bīstamo atkritumu vai īpašā atkritumu savākšanas vietā, S56
mt: Itfa' dan il-materjal u l-kontenitur tiegħu f'post fejn jinġabar skart perikoluż jew speċjali, S56
nl: Deze stof en de verpakking naar inzamelpunt voor gevaarlijk of bijzonder afval brengen, S56
no: Skal ikke siuppes ut i avløp eller til miljøet\, men leveres til godkjent avfallsbehandlingsanlegg, S56
pl: Zużyty produkt oraz opakowanie dostarczyć na składowisko odpadów niebezpiecznych, S56
pt: Eliminar este produto e o seu recipiente\, enviando-os para local autorizado para a recolha de resíduos perigosos ou especiais, S56
sk: Zneškodnite tento materiál a jeho obal v mieste zberu nebezpečného alebo špeciálneho odpadu, S56
sl: Snov/pripravek in embalažo predati odstranjevalcu nevarnih ali posebnih odpadkov, S56
sv: Lämna detta material och dess behållare till insamlingsställe for farligt avfall, S56

en: Use appropriate container to avoid environmental contamination, S57
cs: Použijte vhodný obal k zamezení kontaminace životního prostředí, S57
de: Zur Vermeidung einer Kontamination der Umwelt geeigneten Behälter verwenden, S57
dk: Skal indesluttes forsvarligt for at undgå miljøforurening, S57
el: Να χρησιµοποιηθεί ο κατάλληλος περιέκτης για να αποφευχθεί µόλυνση του περιβάλλοντος, S57
es: Utilícese un envase de seguridad adecuado para evitar la contaminación del medio ambiente, S57
et: Keskkonnasaaste vältimiseks kasutada sobivat pakendit, S57
fi: Käytettävä sopivaa säilytystapaa ympäristön likaantumisen ehkäisemiseksi, S57
fr: Utiliser un récipient approprié pour éviter toute contamination du milieu ambiant, S57
hu: A környezetszennyezés elkerülése érdekében megfelelő edényzetet kell használni, S57
it: Usare contenitori adeguati per evitare l'inquinamento ambientale, S57
lt: Naudoti tinkamą pakuotę aplinkos taršai išvengti, S57
lv: Izmantot piemērotu tvertni\, lai izvairītos no vides piesārn¸ ošanas, S57
mt: Uża kontenitur adatt biex tevita t-tinġis ta' l-ambjent, S57
nl: Neem passende maatregelen om verspreiding in het milieu te voorkomen, S57
no: Oppbevares/håndteres slik at forurensning av miljøet unngås, S57
pl: Używać odpowiednich pojemników zapobiegających skażeniu środowiska, S57
pt: Utilizar um recipiente adequado para evitar a contaminação do ambiente, S57
sk: Uskutočnite náležitú kontrolu\, aby ste zabránili kontaminácii, S57
sl: S primerno posodo preprečiti onesnaženje okolja, S57
sv: Förvaras på lämpligt sätt för att undvika miljöförorening, S57

en: Refer to manufacturer/supplier for information on recovery/recycling, S59
cs: Informujte se u vý robce nebo dodavatele o regeneraci nebo recyklaci, S59
de: Informationen zur Wiederverwendung/Wiederverwertung beim Hersteller/Lieferanten erfragen, S59
dk: Indhent oplysninger om genvinding/genanvendelse hos producenten/leverandøren, S59
el: Zητήστε πληροφορίες από τον παραγωγό/προµηθευτή για ανά- κτηση/ανακύκλωση, S59
es: Remitirse al fabricante o proveedor para obtener información sobre su recuperación/reciclado, S59
et: Hankida valmistajalt/tarnijalt teave kemikaali taaskasutamise või Ringlussevõtu kohta, S59
fi: Hanki valmistajalta/luovuttajalta tietoja uudelleenkäytösta/kierrätyksestä, S59
fr: Consulter le fabricant/fournisseur pour des informations relatives à la récupération/au recyclage, S59
hu: A hulladékanyag visszanyeréséhez/újrahasznosításához a gyártótól/forgalmazótól kell tájékoztatást kérni, S59
it: Richiedere informazioni al produttore/fornitore per il recupero/riciclaggio, S59
lt: Kreiptis į gamintoją (tiekėją) informacijai apie šių medžiagų ar preparatų panaudojimą arba perdirbimą gauti, S59
lv: Izmantot ražotāja vai izplatītāja informāciju par vielas reciklē- šanu vai reg‘ enerāciju, S59
mt: Irreferi għall-manifattur/fornitur għal informazzjoni fuq rekuperu/ Riċiklaġġ, S59
nl: Raadpleeg fabrikant/leverancier voor informatie over terugwinning/recycling, S59
no: Innhent opplysninger om gjenvinning hos produsent/importør, S59
pl: Przestrzegać wskazówek producenta lub dostawcy dotyczących odzysku lub wtórnego wykorzystania, S59
pt: Solicitar ao produtor/fornecedor informações relativas à sua recuperação/reciclagem, S59
sk: Obrát’te sa na výrobcu s požiadavkou na informácie tý kajúce sa obnovenia a recyklácie, S59
sl: Posvetovati se s proizvajalcem/dobaviteljem o ponovni predelavi/ Recikliranju, S59
sv: Rådfråga tillverkare/leverantör om återvinnig/återanvändning, S59

en: Keep under… (inert gas to be specified by the manufacturer), S6
cs: Uchovávejte pod… (inertní plyn specifikuje vý robce), S6
de: Unter… aufbewahren (inertes Gas vom Hersteller anzugeben), S6
dk: Opbevares under… (en inaktiv gas\, som angives af fabrikanten), S6
el: Να διατηρείται σε ατµόσφαιρα… (το είδος του αδρανούς αερίου καθορίζεται από τον παραγωγό), S6
es: Consérvese en… (gas inerte a especificar por el fabricante), S6
et: Hoida… all (inertgaasi määrab valmistaja), S6
fi: Säilytettävä… (inertin kaasun ilmoittaa valmistaja/maahantuoja), S6
fr: Conserver sous… [gaz inerte à spécifier par le fabricant], S6
it: Conservare sotto… (gas inerte da indicarsi da parte del fabbricante), S6
lt: Laikyti… (inertines dujas nurodo gamintojas) aplinkoje, S6
lv: Uzglabāt… (ražotājs norāda gāzi\, kurā viela vai produkts uzglabājams), S6
mt: Żomm taħt… (gass inerti li jkun speċifikat mill-manifattur), S6
nl: Onder… houden (inert gas aan te geven door fabrikant), S6
no: Oppbevares under… (angis av produsent eller importør), S6
pl: Przechowywać w atmosferze… (obojętnego gazu wskazanego przez producenta), S6
pt: Manter sob… (gás inerte a especificar pelo produtor), S6
sk: Uchovávajte pod… (inertným plynom\, ktorý špecifikuje výrobca), S6
sl: Hraniti v… (ustrezen inertni plin\, v katerem je treba snov ali pripravek hraniti\, določi proizvajalec), S6
sv: Förvaras i… (inert gas anges av tillverkaren), S6

en: This material and its container must be disposed of as hazardous waste, S60
cs: Tento materiál a jeho obal musí být zneškodněny jako nebezpečný odpad, S60
de: Dieses Produkt und sein Behälter sind als gefährlicher Abfall zu entsorgen, S60
dk: Dette materiale og dets beholder skal bortskaffes som farligt affald, S60
el: Το υλικό και ο περιέκτης του να θεωρηθούν κατά τη διάθεσή τους επικίνδυνα απόβλητα, S60
es: Elimínese el producto y su recipiente como residuos peligrosos, S60
et: Kemikaal ja tema pakend kõrvaldada kui ohtlikud jäätmed, S60
fi: Tämä aine ja sen pakkaus on käsiteltävä ongelmajätteenä, S60
fr: Éliminer le produit et son récipient comme un déchet dangereux, S60
hu: Az anyagot és/vagy edényzetét veszélyes hulladékként kell ártalmatlanítani, S60
it: Questo materiale e il suo contenitore devono essere smaltiti come rifiuti pericolosi, S60
lt: Šios medžiagos atliekos ir jos pakuote˙ turi buti šalinamos kaip pavojingos atliekos, S60
lv: Apglabāt šo vielu (produktu) un tās iepakojumu kā bīstamos atkritumus, S60
mt: Dan il-materjal u l-kontenitur tiegħ-u għandhom jintremew ma' skart perikoluż, S60
nl: Deze stof en de verpakking als gevaarlijk afval afvoeren, S60
no: Dette produktet og/eller dets emballasje skal behandles som spesialavfall, S60
pl: Produkt i opakowanie usuwać jako odpad niebezpieczny, S60
pt: Este produto e o seu recipiente devem ser eliminados como resíduos perigosos, S60
sk: Tento materiál a príslušná nádoba musia byt’ zlikvidované ako nebezpečný odpad, S60
sl: Snov/pripravek in embalažo odstraniti kot nevarni odpadek, S60
sv: Detta material och dess behållare skall tas om hand som farligt avfall, S60